Utah statutes.
49-11-504.   Reemployment of a retiree -- Restrictions.
(1)  As used in this section, "full-time" means:
(a)  employment requiring 20 or more hours of work per week; or
(b)  at least a half-time teaching contract.
(2) (a)  Except for the provisions of Subsection (3), the provisions of this
section do not apply to a person who is subject to the provisions of Section
49-11-505.
(b)  This section does not apply to elected positions.
(3)  A person who is not a retiree under this title is not subject to any
postretirement restrictions under this title.
(4)  A retiree of an agency who is reemployed may not earn additional service
credit, if the retiree is reemployed by:
(a)  a different agency; or
(b)  the same agency after six months from the retirement date.
(5)  A retiree of an agency who is reemployed on a full-time basis by the same
agency within six months of the date of retirement is subject to the
following:
(a)  the agency shall immediately notify the office;
(b)  the office shall cancel the retiree’s allowance and reinstate the
retiree to active member status;
(c)  the allowance cancellation and reinstatement to active member status is
effective on the first day of the month following the date of reemployment;
(d)  the reinstated retiree may not retire again with a recalculated benefit
for a two-year period from the date of cancellation of the original allowance,
and if the retiree retires again within the two-year period, the original
allowance shall be resumed; and
(e)  a reinstated retiree retiring after the two-year period shall be credited
with the service credit in the retiree’s account at the time of the first
retirement and from that time shall be treated as a member of a system,
including the accrual of additional service credit, but subject to
recalculation of the allowance under Subsection (9) .
(6)  A retiree of an agency who is reemployed by the same agency within six
months of retirement on a less than full-time basis by the same agency is
subject to the following:
(a)  the retiree may earn, without penalty, compensation from that position
which is not in excess of the exempt earnings permitted by Social Security;
(b)  if a retiree receives compensation in a calendar year in excess of the
Social Security limitation, 25% of the allowance shall be suspended for the
remainder of the six-month period;
(c)  the effective date of a suspension and reinstatement of an allowance
shall be set by the office; and
(d)  any suspension of a retiree’s allowance under this Subsection (6) shall
be applied on a calendar year basis.
(7)  For six months immediately following retirement, the retiree and
participating employer who are subject to Subsection (6) shall:
(a)  maintain an accurate record of gross earnings in employment;
(b)  report the gross earnings at least monthly to the office;
(c)  immediately notify the office in writing of any postretirement earnings
under Subsection (6); and
(d)  immediately notify the office in writing whether postretirement earnings
equal or exceed the exempt earnings under Subsection (6).
(8) (a)  If a participating employer hires a retiree, on a full-time basis,
who may not earn additional service credit under Subsection (4), the
participating employer may not contribute an amount that exceeds the normal
cost rate as defined under Section 49-11-102 to a plan for the retiree under
Subsection (8)(b).
(b)  The contributions under Subsection (8)(a) are not required, but if paid,
shall be paid to a retiree-designated:
(i)  qualified defined contribution plan administered by the board, if the
participating employer participates in a qualified defined contribution plan
administered by the board; or
(ii)  qualified defined contribution plan offered by the participating
employer if the participating employer does not participate in a qualified
defined contribution plan administered by the board.
(c)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection (8)(b), if an employer is
not participating in a qualified defined contribution plan administered by the
board, the employer may elect to pay the contributions under Subsection (8)(a)
to a nonqualified deferred compensation plan administered by the board.
(9)  A retiree who has returned to work, accrued additional service credit,
and again retires shall have the retiree's allowance recalculated using:
(a)  the formula in effect at the date of the retiree’s original retirement
for all service credit accrued prior to that date; and
(b)  the formula in effect at the date of the subsequent retirement for all
service credit accrued between the first and subsequent retirement dates.
(10)  The board may make rules to implement this section.
